Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
115

PUBLIC
ACCESS TO COASTAL AND INLAND RECREATIONAL

AREAS

Section

115-1 Findings and purpose

115-2 Acquisition of lands for public
rights-of-way and

public transit corridors

115-3 Criteria for public rights-of-way

115-3.5 Restricting passage over rights-of-way

115-4 Right of transit along shorelines

115-5 Beach transit corridor defined

115-6 Procedure

115-7 State and county co-sponsorship of
programs

115-8 Expending agency

115-9 Obstructing access to public property;
penalty

115-10 Duty to maintain access within beach
transit

corridors; remedies

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1977, c 164, §2.

Cross References

Statewide trail and access system, see chapter 198D.

Law Journals and Reviews

Beach Access: A Public Right? 23 HBJ 65.

Public Beach Access: A Right for All? Opening the Gate to
Iroquois Point Beach. 30 UH L. Rev. 495.

Case Notes

Existence of chapter does not preclude private right of
action to force beach access. 65 H. 383, 652 P.2d 1130.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next